New York, session 2025-2026, A367.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 182.20 of the criminal procedure 2 law, as separately amended by chapters 232, 279 and 285 of the laws of 3 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided 5 in section 182.30 of this article, the court, in its discretion, may 6 dispense with the personal appearance of the defendant, except an 7 appearance at a hearing or trial, and conduct an electronic appearance 8 in connection with a criminal action pending in [Albany, Bronx, Broome, 9 Erie, Jefferson, Kings, Monroe, New York, Niagara, Oneida, Onondaga, 10 Ontario, Orange, Orleans, Oswego, Putnam, Queens, Richmond, Rockland, 11 Saratoga, St. Lawrence, Seneca, Steuben, Tompkins, Chautauqua, Cattarau- 12 gus, Clinton, Essex, Montgomery, Rensselaer, Sullivan, Warren, Westches- 13 ter, Suffolk, Herkimer, Franklin, Chemung, Schuyler, Yates, Delaware, 14 Otsego or Schoharie] any county, provided that the chief administrator 15 of the courts has authorized the use of electronic appearance and the 16 defendant, after consultation with counsel, consents on the record. Such 17 consent shall be required at the commencement of each electronic appear- 18 ance to such electronic appearance. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 20 ments to subdivision 1 of section 182.20 of the criminal procedure law 21 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 22 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01843-01-5